regression_test_data/crossdict/expected_output/consistent-bilBC.dix
    <pardef n="twenty_hundred__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-one<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-two<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>dos-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-three<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>tres-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-four<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>quatre-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-five<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>cinc-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-six<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>sis-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-seven<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>set-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-eight<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>vuit-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-nine<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>nou-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="thirty_hundred__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-one<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>cent<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-two<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>dos-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-three<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>tres-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-four<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>quatre-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-five<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>cinc-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-six<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>sis-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-seven<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>set-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-eight<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>vuit-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-nine<b/>hundred<s n="num"/></l> 
        <r><b/>mil<b/>nou-cents<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
  </pardefs>
